Utah statutes.
70C-5-103.   Form of agreement or offer -- Statement of buyer's rights.

(1)  In a home solicitation sale, unless the buyer requests the seller to provide goods or services without delay in an emergency, the seller shall present to the buyer and obtain his signature to a written agreement or offer to purchase which designates as the date of the transaction the date on which the buyer actually signs and contains a statement of the buyer's rights which complies with Subsection (2).

(2)  The statement shall:

(a)  appear under the conspicuous caption:  "BUYER'S RIGHT TO CANCEL"; and

(b)  read as follows:

"If this agreement was solicited at your residence or place of employment and you do not want the goods or services, you may cancel this agreement by mailing a notice to the seller.  The notice must say that you do not want the goods or services and must be mailed before midnight on the third business day after you sign this agreement.  The notice must be mailed to: _________________________ (insert name and mailing address of seller)."

(3)  Compliance with any notice of cancellation or similar requirement of any rule of the Federal Trade Commission which by its terms applies to a home solicitation sale covered by this title is deemed compliance with Subsection (2)(b) if compliance is totally consistent with this title.

(4)  Until the seller has complied with this section the buyer may cancel the home solicitation sale by notifying the seller in any manner and by any means of his intention to cancel.



Enacted by Chapter 159, 1985 General Session

